District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.02

Organization.

Repealed.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III, § 302, 24 DCR 3341
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 2(m), 48 DCR 2043
For applicability of D.C. Law 13-277, see note following § 4-1303.01a.
1973 Ed., § 6-2132.
1981 Ed., § 6-2122.